District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0468.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Youth Employment Program Cohort Expansion Amendment Act of
2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 2a(a)(1) of the Youth Employment Act of 1979, effective January 5, 1980
(D.C. Law 3-46; D.C. Official Code § 32-242(a)(1)), is amended as follows:
(a) Subparagraph (A) is amended as follows:
(1) Sub-subparagraph (i) is amended by striking the phrase “24 years of age” both
times it appears and inserting the phrase “30 years of age” in its place.
(2) Sub-subparagraph (iv) is amended by striking the phrase “through 24 years of
age” and inserting the phrase “through 30 years of age” in its place.
(b) New subparagraphs (F) and (G) are added to read as follows:
“(F) The Department of Employment Services shall establish the
following application and programmatic requirements for youth who have received a high school
diploma or general educational development certificate (“GED”) or are over 18 years of age and


are not enrolled in high school or a higher education institution:
“(i) Require that applicants identify past work experience,
professional interests, and personal goals for long-term employment;
“(ii) Prioritize job placements with employers who meet applicant
interests and express interest in continuing employment after the program has ended; and
“(iii) Provide additional career coaching services on soft and hard
skills to help youth be successful in their placement and to support youth in finding sustainable,
long-term employment opportunities after the program ends.
“(G) The Department of Employment Services shall track participant
employment status for 10 years following completion of the program and report the findings to
the Council on a bi-annual basis.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(l) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code§ l-206.02(c)(l)).